Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.105

Disaster response account.

The disaster response account is created in the state treasury. Moneys may be placed in the account from legislative appropriations and transfers, federal appropriations, or any other lawful source. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for support of state agency and local government disaster response and recovery efforts, including the awarding of grants under RCW 38.52.600, response by state and local government and federally recognized tribes to the novel coronavirus pursuant to the gubernatorial declaration of emergency of February 29, 2020, and to reimburse the workers' compensation funds and self-insured employers under RCW 51.16.220. Expenditures from the disaster response account may be used for military department operations and to support wildland fire suppression preparedness, prevention, and restoration activities by state agencies and local governments. The legislature may direct the treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the disaster response account to the state general fund.

[ 2024 c 172 s 4; 2022 c 157 s 10; 2021 c 334 s 963; 2020 c 7 s 6; 2019 c 415 s 956; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 962; 2016 sp.s. c 36 s 918; 2010 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 901; 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 919; 2005 c 422 s 2; 2002 c 371 s 903; 1997 c 251 s 1.]

NOTES:

Short title—Findings—2024 c 172: See notes following RCW 38.52.600.

Conflict with federal requirements—Effective date—2021 c 334: See notes following RCW 43.79.555.

Conflict with federal requirements—Effective date—2020 c 7: See notes following RCW 50.16.100.

Effective date—2019 c 415: See note following RCW 28B.20.476.

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 1: See note following RCW 43.41.455.

Effective date—2016 sp.s. c 36: See note following RCW 18.20.430.

Effective date—2010 2nd sp.s. c 1: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [December 11, 2010]." [ 2010 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 909.]

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 37: See note following RCW 13.06.050.

Rules—Effective date—2005 c 422: See notes following RCW 51.16.220.

Severability—Effective date—2002 c 371: See notes following RCW 9.46.100.

Effective date—1997 c 251: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 5, 1997]." [ 1997 c 251 s 2.]